North Carolina, session 2025, SB81.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 81A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 8.
"Standard Time.
"§ 81A-100. Designation of time.
The standard time of the State and its political subdivisions is the time designated by the
United States Department of Transportation pursuant to the Uniform Time Act of 1966 (15
U.S.C. §§ 260-267). If authorized by Congress, the State and its political subdivisions shall
observe Daylight Saving Time, as provided in 15 U.S.C. § 260a, at all times throughout the year."
SECTION 2. Within 60 days of Congress authorizing the states to observe Daylight
Saving Time throughout the year, the Commissioner of Agriculture shall notify the Governor
who, by executive order or otherwise, shall implement G.S. 81A-100, as enacted by this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S81-v-1*